Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Article 1. Trial Jury.

Sec. 12.45.010.
Formation of trial jury.

The qualification, disqualification, and exemption of jurors, the preparation of jury lists, and the composition of jury panel in criminal actions are the same as provided in civil actions.

History.

(§ 6.01 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For provisions in civil actions, see
AS

09.20.010

—

09.20.100

; for court rules, see Rule 24, Alaska Rule of Criminal Procedure and Rule 47, Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure.

Sec. 12.45.015.
Introduction of victim and defendant to jury.

During jury selection or as part of an opening statement at trial, the prosecuting attorney may introduce the victim to the jury, and the attorney for the defendant may introduce the defendant to the jury.

In this section, “victim” has the meaning given in AS

12.55.185

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 65 SLA 2005)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 7, ch. 65, SLA 2005, provides that the enactment of this section has the effect of amending Rule 27, Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure, by changing the order of proceedings of a trial before a jury to allow for the introduction to the jury of the defendant and the victim.

Sec. 12.45.018.
Juror counseling following graphic evidence or testimony.

The trial judge may offer not more than 10 hours of post-trial psychological counseling, without charge, to a juror or an alternate juror who serves on a trial jury in a trial involving extraordinarily graphic, gruesome, or emotional evidence or testimony.

The counseling offered under (a) of this section applies only to a juror or alternate juror who serves on a trial jury for a trial involving the following offenses:

murder under AS

11.41.100

and

11.41.110

;

manslaughter under AS

11.41.120

;

criminally negligent homicide under AS

11.41.130

;

felonious assault under AS

11.41.200

—

11.41.220

;

a sexual offense under AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.460

.

The counseling offered under (a) of this section

must occur not later than 180 days after the jury is dismissed;

may be provided by the court system, by a state agency, or by contract; and

may be individual or group counseling.

History.

(§ 1 ch 111 SLA 2010)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch 111, SLA 2010, which enacted this section, took effect on September 26, 2010.